Maryland, session 2026, HB0195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–109.
(a) In addition to the specific powers granted and duties imposed by this subtitle,
the Commission has the powers and duties set forth in this section.
(b) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE
Commission shall conduct studies of the State lottery and gaming program to:
(i) identify any defect in this subtitle, Subtitle 1A of this title, or the
regulations of the Agency that may allow abuses in the operation and administration of the
State lottery and gaming program or any evasion of this subtitle, Subtitle 1A of this title,
or the regulations;
(ii) guard against the use of this subtitle, Subtitle 1A of this title,
and the regulations of the Agency as a means of conducting organized crime;
(iii) ensure that the regulations of the Agency are proper and that
this subtitle, Subtitle 1A of this title, and the regulations are administered to serve the
purpose of this subtitle; [and]
(iv) analyze the gaming industry within and outside the State to
determine whether Maryland’s gaming program is competitive and maximizing revenues
for the State; AND

HOUSE BILL 195 3
(V) IDENTIFY THE LATEST TRENDS AND EMERGING
TECHNOLOGY TO CREATE A SAFER, MORE TRANSPARENT GAMBLING ENVIRONMENT,
INCLUDING:
1. CYBERSECURITY TECHNOLOGY TO PROTECT GAMING
ACTIVITIES FROM SECURITY BREACHES THROUGH USE OF DATA ENCRYPTION,
MULTIFACTOR AUTHENTICATION, SECURE PAYMENT GATEWAYS, AND BLOCKCHAIN
TECHNOLOGY;
2. THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO PROTECT
CUSTOMERS, MONITOR BEHAVIORAL PATTERNS OF CUSTOMERS TO ANALYZE
BEHAVIOR, AND PROMOTE RESPONSIBLE GAMING; AND
3. DIGITAL IDENTITY VERIFICATION TO VERIFY THE
CUSTOMER’S AGE AND IDENTITY TO PREVENT ILLEGAL GAMING ACTIVITY AND TO
SUPPORT FACIAL RECOGNITION AND BIOMETRICS TO REDUCE THE RISK OF
IDENTITY FRAUD.
(2) The Commission shall conduct studies of:
(i) the operation and administration of similar laws in other states
or countries;
(ii) federal laws that may affect the operation of the State lottery or
gaming activities;
(iii) literature on lotteries and gaming activities, including problem
gambling programs; and
(iv) the reaction of citizens of the State to existing and potential
features of the State lottery and gaming program.
(C) (1) IF THE COMMISSION DOES NOT HAVE THE RESOURCES OR
EXPERTISE TO CONDUCT A STUDY UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) COLLABORATE AND PARTNER WITH AN INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE, A FOUNDATION, OR A PRIVATE ENTITY TO STUDY
AND ANALYZE BEST PRACTICES IN THE FIELDS DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION; OR
(II) CONTRACT WITH AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION
IN THE STATE, A FOUNDATION, OR A PRIVATE ENTITY TO CONDUCT THE STUDY.

HOUSE BILL 195
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE THE DIRECTOR OR THE
DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE TO COMMUNICATE AND FULLY PARTICIPATE IN A STUDY
CONDUCTED BY AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, A FOUNDATION, OR A
PRIVATE ENTITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
[(c)] (D) (1) The Commission shall submit to the Governor and, subject to §
2–1257 of this article, to the General Assembly the reports required under this subsection.
(2) The Commission shall submit monthly a report that states the total
State lottery and gaming revenues and the total prize disbursements and other expenses
for the preceding month.
(3) The Commission shall submit annually a report that states the total
State lottery and gaming revenues and the total prize disbursements and other expenses
for the preceding year.
(4) The Commission shall submit a report whenever a matter requires an
immediate change in a State law to:
(i) prevent an abuse or evasion of this subtitle, Subtitle 1A of this
title, or a regulation of the Agency; or
(ii) rectify an undesirable condition in the operation or
administration of the State lottery and gaming program.
(D) THE COMMISSION MAY CONDUCT STUDIES, IN COLLABORATION WITH
BOWIE STATE UNIVERSITY, MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY, AND THE MARYLAND
CENTER OF EXCELLENCE ON PROBLEM GAMBLING, TO IDENTIFY THE LATEST
TRENDS AND EMERGING TECHNOLOGY TO CREATE A SAFER, MORE TRANSPARENT
GAMBLING ENVIRONMENT, INCLUDING:
(1) CYBERSECURITY TECHNOLOGY TO PROTECT GAMING ACTIVITIES
FROM SECURITY BREACHES THROUGH USE OF DATA ENCRYPTION, MULTIFACTOR
AUTHENTICATION, SECURE PAYMENT GATEWAYS, AND BLOCKCHAIN TECHNOLOGY;
(2) THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO PROTECT CUSTOMERS,
MONITOR BEHAVIORAL PATTERNS OF CUSTOMERS TO ANALYZE BEHAVIOR, AND
PROMOTE RESPONSIBLE GAMING;
(3) DIGITAL IDENTITY VERIFICATION TO VERIFY THE CUSTOMER’S
AGE AND IDENTITY TO PREVENT ILLEGAL GAMING ACTIVITY AND TO SUPPORT
FACIAL RECOGNITION AND BIOMETRICS TO REDUCE THE RISK OF IDENTITY FRAUD;
AND

HOUSE BILL 195 5
(4) GEOFENCING TECHNOLOGY TO DETERMINE THE IMPACT OF
MOBILE SPORTS WAGERING ON COLLEGE CAMPUSES IN THE STATE.
9–1E–03.
(a) (2) The Commission shall consider the use of technology, remote
surveillance, and other similar measures to carry out its duties under this subsection and
§ 9–1E–04 of this subtitle.
(3) IF THE COMMISSION DOES NOT HAVE THE RESOURCES OR
EXPERTISE TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) COLLABORATE WITH AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION IN THE STATE, A FOUNDATION, OR A PRIVATE ENTITY TO ANALYZE THE
BEST PRACTICES IN USING TECHNOLOGY; OR
(II) CONTRACT WITH AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION
IN THE STATE, A FOUNDATION, OR A PRIVATE ENTITY TO PERFORM THE ANALYSIS.
(4) THE COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE THE DIRECTOR OF THE STATE
LOTTERY AND GAMING CONTROL AGENCY OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE TO
COMMUNICATE AND FULLY PARTICIPATE IN A STUDY CONDUCTED BY AN
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, A FOUNDATION, OR A PRIVATE ENTITY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) In this section, “Commission” means the State Lottery and Gaming Control
Commission.
(b) There is a Workgroup on Gambling Prevention Technology in the Commission.
(c) The Workgroup established under subsection (b) of this section shall be
conducted in partnership with:
(1) (i) Bowie State University;
(ii) Morgan State University; and
(iii) the Maryland Center of Excellence on Problem Gambling; and
(2) any other foundations or private entities as determined by the
Commission.

HOUSE BILL 195
(d) The Workgroup shall study best practices in using gambling prevention
technology, including geofencing technology, to ascertain the extent of problem gambling
on college campuses in the State.
(e) The Commission shall determine the time frame and necessary steps to
establish the Workgroup.
(f) On or before July 1, 2027, the Commission shall submit a report on the
Workgroup’s findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.